District of Columbia statutes.
16-4210

International commercial mediation.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term:

(1)

“International commercial mediation” means an international commercial conciliation as defined in Article 1 of the Model Law.

(2)

“Model Law” means the Model Law on International Commercial Conciliation adopted by the United Nations Commission on International Trade Law on June 28, 2002 and recommended by the United Nations General Assembly in a resolution (A/RES/57/18) dated November 19, 2002.

(b)

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, if a mediation is an international commercial mediation, the mediation is governed by the Model Law.

(c)

Unless the mediation parties agree in accordance with § 16-4202(c) that all or part of an international commercial mediation is not privileged, §§ 16-4203, 16-4204, and 16-4205 and any applicable definitions in § 16-4201 also apply to the mediation and nothing in Article 10 of the Model Law derogates from §§ 16-4203, 16-4204, and 16-4205.

(d)

If the parties to an international commercial mediation agree under Article 1, subsection (7) of the Model Law that the Model Law does not apply, this chapter applies.

Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-87, § 2(b), 53 DCR 1075

History

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 11 of the Uniform Mediation Act.

Editor's Notes